Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Kentucky Pharmaceutical Assistance Program

205.5621.
Definitions for KRS 205.5621 to 205.5625.

As used in KRS 205.5621 to 205.5625:

“Asset test” means the asset limits as defined by the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003, Pub. L. No. 108-173;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services;

“Contractor” means the person, partnership, or corporate entity that has an approved contract with the department to administer the Kentucky Pharmaceutical Assistance Program;

“Department” means the Department for Medicaid Services;

“Enrollee” means a resident of this state who meets the conditions relating to eligibility for the Kentucky Pharmaceutical Assistance Program and whose application for enrollment has been approved by the department;

“Federal poverty guidelines” means the federal poverty guidelines updated annually in the Federal Register by the United States Department of Health and Human Services under the authority of 42 U.S.C. sec. 9902(2);

“Liquid assets” means assets used in the eligibility determination process and defined by the MMA;

“Medicaid dual eligible” or “dual eligible” means a person who is eligible for Medicare and Medicaid as defined by the MMA;

“Medicare Modernization Act” or “MMA” means the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003, Pub. L. No. 108-173;

“Medicare Part D prescription drug benefit” means the prescription benefit provided under the MMA, as it may vary from one (1) PDP to another;

“Participating pharmacy” means a pharmacy that elects to participate as a pharmaceutical provider and enters into a participating network agreement with the department;

“Prescription drug plan” or “PDP” means a nongovernmental drug plan under contract with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to provide prescription benefits under the MMA;

“Program” means the Kentucky Pharmaceutical Assistance Program established in KRS 205.5621 to 205.5625; and

“Resident” means a person who has lived within this state for a period of at least ninety (90) consecutive days and who meets the conditions as set forth in KRS 205.5625. A person shall be considered a resident until the person establishes a permanent residence outside of the state.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 136, § 6, effective June 20, 2005.

205.5622.
Kentucky Pharmaceutical Assistance Program — Contingency for establishment — Purpose — Eligibility — Enrollment priority.

The Kentucky Pharmaceutical Assistance Program may be established, contingent upon approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

If established, the program shall be administered by the department. The program shall coordinate prescription drug coverage with the prescription drug benefit under the MMA. A person shall be eligible for drug benefits under this program if the person:

Is a resident who is:

Sixty-five (65) years of age or older; or

Disabled and receiving a Social Security benefit and is enrolled in the Medicare program;

Has a household income at or below one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal poverty guidelines;

Meets the asset test;

Is not a member of a Medicare Advantage Plan that provides a prescription drug benefit; and

Is not a member of a retirement plan that is receiving a benefit under the MMA.

The department shall give initial enrollment priority to the Medicaid dual eligible population. A second enrollment priority shall be offered to Medicare eligible applicants who have annual household incomes up to one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal poverty guidelines and who meet the asset test.
(3) (a)

The department shall give initial enrollment priority to the Medicaid dual eligible population. A second enrollment priority shall be offered to Medicare eligible applicants who have annual household incomes up to one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal poverty guidelines and who meet the asset test.

Enrollment for Medicaid dual eligible persons shall take effect no later than October 1, 2005. Medicaid dual eligible persons may be automatically enrolled into the program, except that they may choose to opt out of the program. The department shall determine the procedures for automatic enrollment into and election out of the program. Applicants meeting the qualifications set forth in KRS 205.5621 to 205.5625 may begin enrolling into the program at a time and in a manner as determined by the department.

An individual or married couple meeting the eligibility requirements in subsection (1) of this section and not Medicaid dual eligible may apply for enrollment in the program by submitting an application to the department that attests to the age, residence, household income, and liquid assets of the individual or couple.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 136, § 7, effective June 20, 2005.

205.5623.
Department’s powers in providing program benefits.

In providing program benefits, the department may:

Enter into a contract with one (1) or more prescription drug plans to coordinate the prescription benefits of the program and the federal law;

Preliminarily enroll beneficiaries into a preferred Medicare Part D plan, with an opt-out provision for individuals. Individuals who opt out of the preferred PDP shall remain enrolled in the program unless they choose to disenroll from the program;

Prescribe the application and enrollment procedures for prospective enrollees;

Select, in accordance with applicable state law, a contractor to assist in the administration of the program or negotiate program administrative functions with a preferred PDP plan;

Determine which drugs will be covered by the plan; and

Negotiate with manufacturers for rebates.

Program benefits shall begin January 1, 2006.

For persons meeting eligibility requirements, the program may pay all or some of the deductibles, coinsurance payments, premiums, and copayments required under the Medicare Part D pharmacy benefit program.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 136, § 8, effective June 20, 2005.

205.5624.
Payment of benefits — Limitations — Qualification for coverage.

Benefits provided under the program shall be limited to the amount of appropriations.

The program shall be the payor of last resort. The program shall cover costs for participants that are not covered by the Medicare Part D program.

Except for dual eligibles during the transition period, during which they are being moved from Medicaid to a Medicare Part D program, applicants who are qualified for coverage of payments for prescription drugs under a public assistance program shall be ineligible for the program for so long as they are so qualified.

Applicants who are qualified for full coverage of payments for prescription drugs under another plan of assistance or insurance shall be ineligible to receive benefits from the program for so long as they are eligible to receive pharmacy benefits from the other plan.

Applicants who are qualified for partial payments for prescription drugs under another insurance plan shall be eligible for the program but may receive reduced assistance from the program.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 136, § 9, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 184, § 13, effective June 20, 2005.

205.5625.
Residency standards.

A resident in the program shall be a person who has lived within this state for at least ninety (90) consecutive days immediately preceding the date that the person’s application to participate in the program is received by the department. The applicant shall have or intend to have a fixed place of abode in this state, with the present intent of maintaining a permanent home in this state for the indefinite future. The burden of establishing proof of residence within this state is on the applicant. A resident shall also include those persons residing in long-term care institutions located within this state.

The department shall create standards for documenting proof of residence in this state. Documents used to demonstrate proof of residence shall show the applicant’s name and address.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 136, § 10, effective June 20, 2005.